Mississippi statutes. Title 91. Trusts and Estates
Article 5. Resignation and Succession of Trustees.

§§ 91-9-201 through 91-9-213.
Repealed.

Repealed by Laws, 2014, ch. 421, § 107, effective from and after July 1, 2014.

§91-9-201. [Codes, 1942, § 672-151; Laws, 1966, ch. 373, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1966).]

§91-9-203. [Codes, 1942, § 672-152; Laws, 1966, ch. 373, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1966).]

§91-9-205. [Codes, 1942, § 672-153; Laws, 1966, ch. 373, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1966).]

§91-9-207. [Codes, 1942, § 672-154; Laws, 1966, ch. 373, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1966).]

§91-9-209. [Codes, 1942, § 672-155; Laws, 1966, ch. 373, § 5, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1966).]

§91-9-211. [Codes, 1942, § 672-156; Laws, 1966, ch. 373, § 6, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1966).]

§91-9-213. [Codes, 1942, § 672-157; Laws, 1966, ch. 373, § 7, eff from and after passage (approved May 6, 1966).]